Utah statutes.
53A-3-501.   Possession or consumption of alcoholic beverages at school or
school-sponsored activities -- Penalty.
(1) Except as approved by a local school board as part of the curriculum, a
person may not possess or drink an alcoholic beverage:
(a)  inside or on the grounds of any building owned or operated by a part of
the public education system; or
(b)  in those portions of any building, park, or stadium which are being used
for an activity sponsored by or through any part of the public education
system.
(2) (a)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to property owned by a school
district in contemplation of future use for school purposes while the property
is under lease to another party.
(b) (i)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), a lease must be full time for a
period of not less than two years.
(ii)  The property may not be used for school purposes at any time during the
lease period.
(3)  Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
